es: Largo de cabello compatible: Extralargo; Largo; Mediano; Corto; Otro
el: Συμβατό μήκος μαλλιών: Πολύ μακριά; Μακριά; Μεσαία; Κοντά; Άλλο
da: Kompatibel hårlængde: Ekstra langt; Langt; Mellemlangt; Kort; Andet
en: Compatible hair length: Extra long; Long; Medium; Short; Other
sl-SI: Združljiva dolžina las: Zelo dolgo; Dolgo; Srednje; Kratko; Drugo
ja: 互換性のある髪の長さ: エクストラロング; ロング; ミディアム; ショート; その他
pl: Kompatybilna długość włosów: Bardzo długie; Długie; Średnie; Krótkie; Inne
vi: Chiều dài tóc tương thích: Rất dài; Dài; Vừa; Ngắn; Khác
ru: Совместимая длина волос: Очень длинные; Длинные; Средние; Короткие; Другое
nl: Compatibele haarlengte: Extra lang; Lang; Medium; Kort; Overig
cs: Kompatibilní délka vlasů: Velmi dlouhé; Dlouhé; Střední; Krátké; Jiné
zh-CN: 适配头发长度: 特长; 长; 中; 短; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamas plaukų ilgis: Labai ilgi; Ilgi; Vidutiniai; Trumpi; Kita
th: ความยาวผมที่เหมาะกับผลิตภัณฑ์: ยาวพิเศษ; ยาว; ปานกลาง; สั้น; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Comprimento de cabelo compatível: Extra longo; Longo; Médio; Curto; Outro
fi: Yhteensopiva hiusten pituus: Erittäin pitkä; Pitkä; Keskipitkä; Lyhyt; Muu
fr: Longueur de cheveux compatible: Très longs; Longs; Mi-longs; Courts; Autre
hu: Kompatibilis hajhossz: Extra hosszú; Hosszú; Közepes; Rövid; Egyéb
nb: Kompatibel hårlengde: Ekstra langt; Langt; Medium; Kort; Annet
tr: Uyumlu saç uzunluğu: Ekstra uzun; Uzun; Orta; Kısa; Diğer
zh-TW: 適用的頭髮長度: 特長; 長; 中等; 短; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilná dĺžka vlasov: Veľmi dlhé; Dlhé; Stredne dlhé; Krátke; Iné
hr-HR: Kompatibilna duljina kose: Vrlo duga; Duga; Srednje duga; Kratka; Ostalo
ro-RO: Lungime a părului compatibilă: Extra lung; Lung; Mediu; Scurt; Altele
sv: Kompatibel hårlängd: Extra långt; Långt; Mellanlångt; Kort; Övrigt
de: Kompatible Haarlänge: Sehr lang; Lang; Mittel; Kurz; Sonstige
it: Lunghezza dei capelli compatibile: Molto lunghi; Lunghi; Medi; Corti; Altro
ko: 적합한 모발 길이: 엑스트라 롱; 롱; 미디엄; 숏; 기타
bg-BG: Съвместима дължина на косата: Много дълга; Дълга; Средна; Къса; Друго
pt-BR: Comprimento de cabelo compatível: Extralongo; Longo; Médio; Curto; Outro